Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.9266, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Children and family interventions and supports. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall administer grant funds to a statewide organization that focuses solely on prevention of and intervention with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders. The grantee shall develop and implement programming or approaches to support and educate people living with a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder and their families and caregivers. The grantee shall provide resource navigation, individualized and group support, education, and opportunities for social connection for caregivers and people impacted by a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDER-RELATED GRANTS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for distribution of fetal alcohol spectrum disorder-related grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.9266, subdivisions 1 to 3 and 8. new text end